Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1520
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that:

(1) Supporting the efforts of families and caregivers to care for individuals at home is efficient, cost effective, and humane. Families receiving occasional respite services are less likely to request admission of an individual to a nursing home, foster care, or other out-of-home care at public expense;

(2) Respite services reduce family and caregiver stress, enhance family and caregiver coping ability, and strengthen family and caregiver ability to meet the challenging demands of caring for family members;

(3) Respite services reduce the risk of abuse and neglect of children, senior citizens, and other vulnerable groups; and

(4) Coordinated, noncategorical respite services must be available locally to provide reliable respite services when needed by families and caregivers regardless of where they live in Nebraska.

Laws 1999, LB 148, § 1.